Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.905

Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

Chapter 437, Laws of 2019 modifies, limits, or supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

[ 2019 c 437 s 803.]